Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 1 Corporations — General Provisions

7-1-1 — 7-1-4.
[Repealed.]

7-1-5.
Corporations organized for the business of insurance.

Notwithstanding any general law to the contrary, any corporation, whether organized with capital stock or as a mutual association, that is organized for the purpose of carrying on within this state the business of insurance, surety, or indemnity, shall be organized pursuant to chapter 1.2 of this title and shall have all the rights and privileges and be subject to provisions of chapter 1 of title 27, relating to domestic insurance companies; provided, however, the articles of incorporation comply with requirements established by rule or regulation promulgated by the director of the department of business regulation, and provided, further, that no insurance corporation may commence business until it has satisfied the requirements enumerated in §

27-1-37

. Any corporation as defined in this section and, notwithstanding the provisions of §

27-41-22

, any corporation organized, created, or established in any manner pursuant to chapters 19, 20, 20.1, 20.2, 20.3, and 41 of title 27, shall obtain prior approval from the director of the department of business regulation for all charter amendments made pursuant to this title. Any corporation defined in this section created by special act of the general assembly, may amend its charter pursuant to §

7-1.2-902

, subject to prior approval of the amendment by the director of the department of business regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 48, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 2.

7-1-5.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 48, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 2, effective June 28, 1999.

7-1-5.2.
Mutual insurance associations — Applicability of chapter.

Notwithstanding any provision of §

7-1-5

to the contrary, and without intending to limit those sections of chapter 1.2 of this title that may not be applicable to mutual associations by reason of the fact that those associations do not have shareholders, the following sections of chapter 1.2 of this title do not apply to any insurance company organized as a mutual association: §

7-1.2-601

(Right of corporation to acquire, dispose of, and cancel its own shares); §

7-1.2-602

(Authorized shares; shares in classes or series; issuance of shares); §

7-1.2-705

(Quorum of shareholders required for shareholders’ action); § 7-1.2-1201 (Rights of shareholders to dissent); § 7-1.2-1202 (Rights of dissenting shareholders); § 7-1.2-1315 (Avoidance of dissolution by share buyout); and § 7-1.2-1602(c)(2) (License fees payable by domestic corporations).

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 2.

7-1-6.
Time allowed for organization of corporations created by legislative act.

Every corporation created by special act of the general assembly shall, if no different time for that purpose is limited by the special act, be organized within two (2) years after the act takes effect. In every case where the corporation is not organized within the limited time, the act of incorporation becomes void at the end of the limited time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1925, § 81; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 81; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 81; G.L. 1956, §

7-1-6

.

7-1-7.
Fees payable by corporations created by legislative act.

Before any corporation, other than a corporation for religious, literary, or charitable purposes, or a military or fire company, is organized under a charter granted by special act of the general assembly, the petitioners for the charter shall pay into the general treasury, for the use of the state, one-tenth of one percent (.1%) of the total amount of its authorized capital stock having par value, and in the case of stock having no par value ten cents ($0.10) for each share, but in no case less than one hundred dollars ($100); and whenever the authorized capital stock of any such corporation is increased by special act of the general assembly, the corporation shall pay into the general treasury, for the use of the state, one-tenth of one percent (.1%) of the total amount of the authorized increase in the case of stock having par value, and in the case of stock having no par value, ten cents ($0.10) for each share of the authorized increase; and the secretary of state shall not issue a certified copy of any act creating a corporation, or a certified copy of any act providing for an increase, until the secretary receives the certificate of the general treasurer to the effect that the required sum has been paid.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 29, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 39, § 16; P.L. 1920, ch. 1925, § 87; G.L. 1923, ch. 37, § 12; P.L. 1929, ch. 1391, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 97; G.L. 1956, §

7-1-7

.

7-1-7.1.
Filings to be originals.

Filings made under this title at the secretary of state’s office are considered original and valid if they bear either original signatures, facsimile, or electronic signatures and shall include, but not be limited to any electronically transmitted documents or similar communications transmitted through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 123, § 1.

7-1-8 — 7-1-12.
[Repealed.]

7-1-13.
Legislative control of future charters.

The charter or articles of association of every corporation subsequently created may be amended or repealed at the will of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1925, § 79; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 79; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 79; G.L. 1956, §

7-1-13

.

7-1-14.
Continuation for special purposes of statutes otherwise repealed.

Whenever any special act creating a corporation, the provisions of which are not subject to amendment or repeal at the will of the general assembly, refers to and adopts, either expressly or by implication, any statute or part of a statute previously repealed, the statute or part of a statute referred to and adopted is not deemed repealed, but is for the purpose for which it is referred to and adopted, but for no other purpose, deemed to be in force.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1925, § 89; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 87; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 87; G.L. 1956, §

7-1-14

.

7-1-15, 7-1-16.
[Repealed.]

7-1-17.
Receipt of property for charitable purposes in excess of authorized holdings.

In case any real or personal estate is subsequently given to any corporation to hold for any charitable uses or purposes authorized or permitted by the charter of the corporation, or any amendment of the charter, or by law, and the corporation, but for the provisions of this section, would not be able to take or hold the estate or some part of it on account of the limitation as to the amount of property of the corporation prescribed by the charter or any amendment to it, then in every such case, it is lawful for the corporation to take and hold the real and personal estate, or the part of it as already stated, upon conditions subsequent, nevertheless, that the corporation obtains from the general assembly authority to take and hold real and personal estate to an amount large enough to include, in addition to its other property, the property given to the corporation as already stated, and that the application to the general assembly is made not later than one year from the time on which the corporation takes and holds, or but for the previously stated limitation would be entitled to take and hold, the given real or personal estate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 177, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 213, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 91; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 91; P.L. 1944, ch. 1400, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-1-17

.

7-1-18 — 7-1-20.
[Repealed.]

7-1-21.
Agreements as to disposition of stock or insurance on death of stockholder.

No agreement in writing, between or among two (2) or more stockholders in a corporation, or between or among a corporation and one or more of its stockholders, whether in either case the agreement is made by all or less than all of the stockholders of the corporation, either previously or subsequently entered into, is deemed testamentary in character, or for that reason invalid or unenforceable, because the agreement contains a provision or provisions: (1) Regulating, in the event of the death of any stockholders, the transfer, distribution, or other disposition of all or any portion of the stock of the deceased stockholder to his or her estate or to the corporation or to or among the other stockholder or stockholders of the corporation or its, his, her, or their assignees, transferees, or successors; or (2) Regulating the destination, distribution, or other disposition of the proceeds of any policy, or policies, of insurance upon the life of any stockholder.

This section is not construed to affect the rights of the heirs, next of kin, legatees, devisees, or creditors of a stockholder who has deceased prior to May 6, 1957.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 99; P.L. 1954, ch. 3346, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-1-21

; P.L. 1957, ch. 105, § 1.

7-1-22.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 177, § 38; G.L. 1909, ch. 213, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 95; P.L. 1930, ch. 1612, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 95; G.L. 1956, §

7-1-22

; Repealed by P.L. 1968, ch. 43, § 1.

7-1-23.
Recovery of penalties — Compromise.

All penalties imposed by the terms of the general corporation law for failure to comply with the requirements of that law shall be recovered in a civil action brought in the name and on behalf of the state by the attorney general; provided, however, that the attorney general may, after examination of the facts as he or she deems advisable, compromise any penalty instead of instituting an action for the penalty, and permit the payment to the general treasurer for the use of the state of a smaller sum in lieu of the maximum penalty provided by the general corporation law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1925, § 82; G.L. 1923, ch. 248, § 82; G.L. 1938, ch. 116, § 82; G.L. 1956, §

7-1-23

.

7-1-24 — 7-1-26.
[Repealed.]